Utah statutes.
17-32-1.   Powers and duties of bail commissioners.
(1)  The county executive, with the advice and consent of the county
legislative body, may appoint one or more responsible and discreet members of
the sheriff's department of the county as a bail commissioner.
(2)  A bail commissioner shall have authority to fix and receive bail for
persons arrested in the county for misdemeanors under the laws of the state,
or for a violation of any of the county ordinances in accordance with the
uniform bail schedule adopted by the Judicial Council or a reasonable bail for
county ordinances not contained in the schedule.
(3)  Any person who has been ordered by a bail commissioner to give bail may
deposit the amount with the bail commissioner:
(a)  in money, by cash, certified or cashier's check, personal check with
check guarantee card, money order, or credit card, if the bail commissioner
has chosen to establish any of those options; or
(b)  by a bond issued by a bail bond surety qualified under the rules of the
Judicial Council.
(4)  Any money or bond collected by a bail commissioner shall be delivered to
the appropriate court within three days of receipt of the money or bond.
(5)  The court may review the amount of bail ordered by a bail commissioner
and may modify the amount of bail required for good cause.
